Utah statutes.
36-11-301.   Contingent compensation prohibited.

A person may not employ or solicit another to serve as a lobbyist for compensation contingent in whole or part upon the passage, defeat, or amendment of legislative action or the approval, modification, or denial of a certain executive action.

